Washington statutes.
RCW 35.97.020

Heating systems authorized.

(1) Counties, cities, towns, irrigation districts which distribute electricity, sewer districts, water districts, port districts, and metropolitan municipal corporations are authorized pursuant to this chapter to establish heating systems and supply heating services from Washington's heat sources.

(2) Nothing in this chapter authorizes any municipality to generate, transmit, distribute, or sell electricity.

[ 1989 c 11 s 7; 1987 c 522 s 3; 1983 c 216 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 11: See note following RCW 9A.56.220.